F. INTERNAL SECURITY 

1. Please describe the structure of the security forces, including possible paramilitary forces. To what extent have paramilitary forces that existed during the crisis of 2001 been dismantled? Please explain when and how this has been done. 
According to the Law on Organisation and Operation of the State Administrative Bodies (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 1/95, 55/9758/00 and 44/02) and the Law on Internal Affairs, (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 58/00 and 44/02) the Ministry of the Interior is responsible for the internal security of the State. The relevant structures of the Ministry of the Interior are:  I. Bureau for Public Security  The operations in the system of public security under the competence of the Bureau for Public Security are carried out through police officers with special duties and authorities (authorised officers) and civil servants without Police authorities. These operations are structured in the border and criminal Police, organised and authorised for the following issues:1) Department for Police comprising the Sector for Public Order and Peace; Road Traffic Safety Sector; Special Task Unit and the Rapid Deployment Special Unit.Pursuant to Article 1 of the Law on Internal Affairs, operations regarding the maintenance of public order and peace, the regulation and control of road traffic, the security of lakes and other operations falling under the authority of the Police.The Special Task Unit–established in 1981 is engaged in all security cases and events when regular Police Units are not capable to fully respond to complex tasks in the fight against terrorism, hostage situations, countering armed resistance, providing security for VIPs and public facilities and supports the fight against organised crime. Currently, this unit consists of 220 members from the ranks of authorised officers of the Ministry as well as cadets from the Police Academy. The new organisation of the unit that was introduced on 01.11.2004 envisages the reduction of its members to 183.The new formation composition entails command, three operational groups, shadowing and surveillance team, negotiation team and a group for planning, support and logistics.The Rapid Deployment Unit has a task to support exclusively police units on the territory of the Republic of Macedonia. Its tasks also include fight against organised crime in rural areas and securing the public order and peace. The unit has been trained to independently perform high-risk police operations in different environments, as well as temporary duties in operations of surveillance, patrolling and apprehending in rural areas. Rescue missions in mountainous regions as well as rescue missions during a natural disaster are also within the competencies of this unit.2) Department for Border Police The Department for Border Police performs operations regarding the protection of the state border; border crossing control; detecting and resolving border accidents and other violations of the state border, as well as other operations as determined by law.3) Department for Criminal Police         The Criminal Police pursuant to Article 12 of the Law on Internal Affairs performs operations in the prevention of criminal acts; detects and arrests perpetrators of crimes; carries out forensic work; performs control of residence and movement of aliens; performs inspection surveillance in the protection from fires and explosions, as well as other operations.       Chapter I             Political Criteria Since January 2005 a Department for Organised Crime has been established. II. Directorate for Security and Counter-Intelligence  Pursuant to Article 13 of the Law on Internal Affairs, the Directorateperforms operations related to the protection from espionage, terrorism and other activities aimed at the endangering or destruction of democratic institutions, established in accordance with the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia. The Directoratealso has authorities in the protection from more severe forms of organised crime.  The ongoing police reform through the implementation of the Strategy and the Action Plan, has resulted in phased restructuring of the Police forces (for more details see I_F_05I_F_07In the course of the crisis in 2001 and in a complex security situation in the country, the President of the Republic of Macedonia issued a Decision for Establishing a Temporary Unit for Fight Against Terrorism. Similarly, the Government of the Republic of Macedonia adopted a Decision for the Establishment of а Special Task Units for the Prevention and Fight Against Terrorism in Macedonia, incorporating units of the Army of the Republic of Macedonia designated by the President of the Republic with a special decision and Police units designated by the Minister of the Interior with a special order. Pursuant to these decisions, the Minister of the Interior has brought a Decision for the Establishment of a Police Battalion for Rapid Intervention of the Ministry of the Interior by the act Sc. No. 16.1-4475/1 of 06.08.2001, which establishes the Police Battalion for Rapid Intervention, comprising members of the Special Police Unit, Regular police officers and Reserve Police members.The Battalion for Rapid Intervention – the Lions, as an internal organisational form of the Sector for Special Units, within the Department for Police of the Ministry of the Interior, was introduced in September 2001, in accordance with the Rulebook Amending the Rulebook on Systematisation of Posts in the Ministry of the Interior SC. No. 16.1/5091/1 of 05.09.2001. Pursuant to the changes in this Rulebook SC. No. 16.1-6239/1 of 07.11.2001, its name was changed into a Rapid Intervention Unit – Lions, as an independent internal organisational form of the Department for Police. The procedure for the establishment of this Unit had been carried out contrary to the legal acts and by abusing the Decisions of government institutions. Most of the persons incorporated in the Unit had not been members of the Special Police Unit or members of either the regular or reserve composition of the Police. They had voluntarily joined the Police for the protection of the sovereignty and the territorial integrity of the Republic of Macedonia.   With the Decision for transformation of this unit, (No. 3/1 of 27.01.2003 adopted by the Government of the Republic of Macedonia), the Decision for the Establishment of the Special Task Unit - the Lions  became null and void, as well as all acts adopted on the basis of the Decision (the Decision for the Establishment of a Police Battalion for Rapid Intervention of the Ministry and the Order for the Designation of the Ministry’s Units to Enter into the Temporary Joint Unit for the Fight Against Terrorism). The Decision for transformation of this unit, also provided for the reassignment of its members (those already employed in the Ministry of the Interior) into the organisational units of the Ministry, was followed by a procedure before established commissions in the Ministry. These commissions took into consideration all relevant factors for every employee in accordance with the existing laws and on the basis of received consent for secured funds for such reassignment. Persons included into the Unit without a valid employment contract were required to surrender all arms and equipment as well as vehicles and uniforms in property of the Ministry. They were also asked to leave the facilities of the Ministry. Measures were stipulated for persons not obeying such orders in accordance with the provisions of the Decision and existing laws. Pursuant to this Decision, 430 members of the former Unit – the Lions were reassigned to regular police services throughout the country; 200 were reassigned to positions in the Army of the Republic of Macedonia, and the rest were discharged of the equipment and dissmissed. Thus, the process of dismantling was finalised. 2. Is there currently a permanent police presence throughout the country? 
The Ministry of the Interior is organised on a territorial principle. It performs its law-enforcement authority through twelve Sectors for Internal Affairs as regional organisational units within the Ministry. They include a total of 123 Police stations. Such organisational structure allows Police presence on the entire territory of the Republic of Macedonia. The institutions of the Republic of Macedonia are enforcing the state legal system on its entire territory. In the period following the 2001 crisis, the Ministry of the Interior faced cases of deteriorated security situation in certain regions of the country, manifested with citizens’ lack of confidence in the institutions of the system, in particular, in the police. In that context, in accordance with the Principal Plan for Return of the Security Forces in the Crisis Regions and Establishment of Control Over these Regions, activities were undertaken for gradual stabilisation of the security situation and creation of pre-conditions for return of the internally displaced persons.  The implementation of the Principle Plan, which started in October 2001, was completed by 12.07.2002, despite certain resistance and protests by the local population. This was achieved through phased return of the Police in these regions and by consolidating citizens’ confidence. In regions with population of mixed ethnic origin, police patrols were of multi-ethnic composition. Coordinator of all activities stipulated by this Plan was the Coordinating Body for Crisis Management within the Government of the Republic of Macedonia, which carried out its function in cooperation with the Ministry of the Interior, the Army of the Republic of Macedonia, local authorities and international missions to Macedonia. The positive trend towards full establishment of the rule of law in the former crisis regions and the significant decrease in the number of incidents continued in accordance with the Plan for Police Conduct after the Implementation of the Principal Plan. A set of measures was stipulated with this Plan for continuation of the confidence-building activities between the Police and the local population. In addition, the Plan expressed the commitment for joint action in resolving everyday problems so that the citizens would restore confidence in the institutions of the system. This was especially important in cases when citizens, living in the crisis regions, and in particular in certain areas close to the state border with Serbia and Montenegro, in the part towards Kosovo, were blocking roads, mostly in order to create pressure to fulfil their requirements for resolving infrastructural problems. In addition, the Ministry had to deal with a number of criminal gangs composed of criminals from the Republic of Macedonia and abroad, that remained as remnants of the conflict of 2001 terrorising the local population. In these cases, the Ministry resolved the issues in a satisfactory manner for the citizens, by providing support to the local authorities through everyday contacts with them and by respecting and guaranteeing citizens’ rights. In doing so, the Ministry emphasised the obligation of all citizens to exercise their rights and fulfil duties in accordance with the laws and regulations. By acting in this manner, the Ministry of the Interior has attained the goal of being permanently present among citizens, guaranteeing their personal security, security of their property and promoting the quality of policing, i.e. becoming a true citizens’ service. 
3. What percentage of police officers/members of the security forces are from ethnic minorities? If available, please provide a breakdown of such figures by rank and seniority. 
Adhering to the provisions of the Ohrid Framework Agreement, the Ministry of the Interior has accelerated the dynamics of employment of members of non-majority ethnic communities. A number of public vacancy announcements have been publicised for the employment of Police trainees, civil servants and for employment of persons with a higher education degree into the Criminal Police and the Directorate for Security and Counter-Intelligence. The overall number of employees in the Ministry of the Interior is 12.462. Out of these, 82,28% are Macedonians; 13,31% are members of the Albanian community; 0,59% are members of the Turkish community; 1,74% are members of the Serbian community; 0,65% are members of the Roma community and 1,43% are members of other communities  Out of the total, the uniformed Police comprises of 8.216 employees. Out of these, 78,16% are Macedonians; 16,91% are members of the Albanian community; the Turkish community 0,68%; the Serbian community 1,85%; the Roma community 0,86% and 1,53% are from the other communities  The situation regarding the representation of various communities in the criminal Police and the operational part of the Ministry is the following: out of the total number of employees (1205), Macedonians comprise 85,56%; members of the Albanian community comprise 10,37%; members of the Turkish community comprise 0,50%; members of the Serbian community comprise 1,83%; members of the Roma community comprise 0,17% and members of other communities comprise 1,58%. The breakdown of such figures by rank in the Police is the following: 13,3% of the senior ranking officers are from the Albanian community and 6,6% are from all the other communities. In the category of officers, there are 8,23% members of the Albanian community, 0,2% of the Turkish community, 1,2% of the Serbian community and 2% of the other communities. As for the category of junior officers, members of the Albanian community comprise 10,7%, members of the Turkish community comprise 1,4%, members of the Serbian community comprise 4%, members of the Roma community comprise 0,6% and members of the other communities comprise 2,5% out of the total number. In the category of non-commissioned officers, Albanians are represented with 19,2%, Turks with 0,6%, Serbs with 1,5%, Roma with 1% and others with 1,4%.  With regard to the managerial positions in the uniformed Police, ethnic Albanians are represented with 1,1%, Serbs with 0,28%, Turks with 0,05%, Roma with 0,06% and others with 0,2%. Regarding executive officers (the rest of the uniformed Police), Albanians are represented with 16,50%, Serbs with 1,6%, Turks with 0,7%, Roma with 0,8% and others with 1,5%. Out of the total number of employees at the Department for Criminal Police i.e. the operational part of the Ministry: Albanians are represented with 1,7%, Serbs with 0,5%, Turks with 0,1% and others with 0,5%. In the executive part (the remaining operational part) Albanians are represented with 8,8%, Serbs with 1,8%, Turks with 0,4%, Roma with 0,1% and others with 0,86%.  MINISTRY OF THE INTERIOR Macedonians Albanians Turks Serbs Roma Others Total number of employees 82,28% 13,31% 0,59% 1,74% 0,65% 1,43% Total number of uniformed Police  78,16% 16,91% 0,68% 1,85% 0,86% 1,53% Senior officers  80,10% 13,30% 6,60% Officers 88,37% 8,23% 0,2& 1,20% 2% Junior officers 8,08% 10,70% 1,40% 4% 0,60% 2,50% Non-commissioned officers 76,80% 19,20% 0,60% 1,50% 1% 1,40% Managerial staff  98,31% 1,10% 0,05% 0,28% 0,06% 0,20% Executive officers 78,90% 16,50% 0,70% 1,60% 0,80% 1,50% Total number of Criminal Police          85,56% 10,37% 0,50% 1,83% 0,17% 1,58% Executive staff in the Criminal Police 97,20% 1,70% 0,10% 0,50% 0,50% Executive officers 88,04% 8,80% 0,40% 1,80% 0,10% 0,86% The Ministry of the Interior continues to direct its activities toward the acceleration of the implementation of provisions contained in the Ohrid Framework Agreement, which ultimately should result in equitable representation of members of all non-majority communities in every segment of the Ministry.  4. What measures have been taken to ensure the return of the police to the former crisis areas? What measures have been taken to consolidate the rule of law in the former crisis areas? 
Security forces of the Republic of Macedonia, being guided by the commitment for comprehensive implementation of the 2001 Framework Agreement which brought resolution to the crisis, after the completion of the operation “Essential Harvest”, and in order to ensure phased return of the security forces, including in particular return of the Police, have envisaged numerous measures and activities, which were part of the Principal Plan for Return of the Security Forces in the Crisis Regions. During the preparation of the Plan, officials from the Ministry of the Interior and the Army of the Republic of Macedonia had numerous meetings with the representatives of the international community in Macedonia, including representatives of OSCE, EUMM and NATO Forces (“Amber Fox”), in order to determine an optimal plan for gradual return of the security forces in the settlements. The plan resulted in re-integration of these regions into the territorial integrity of the country and the re-establishment of the sovereignty, thus enabling free movement of people and return of the internally displaced persons. The basic guiding principles for the Ministry of the Interior in this process were the following: coordination, transparency, legality, responsibility, gradual implementation, and flexibility. These principles served as a basis for restoration of confidence between the population in these areas and the Police. The gradual implementation became a basic methodological principle for implementation of the Principle Plan. Principle coordinator of all activities stipulated by the Principle Plan has been the Crisis Management Coordinating Body within the Government of the Republic of Macedonia, which carried out its function in co-operation with the Ministry of the Interior, Army of the Republic of Macedonia, local authorities and international missions to Macedonia. The Draft Principle Plan for Return of the Security Forces of the Republic of Macedonia in the Former Crisis Regions was submitted for review and approval by the Government. The Government adopted the Plan on 04.12.2001 and it became the framework of measures and activities for the security forces in their return to these regions. Upon a proposal by the working group comprising representatives of the Ministry of the Interior and the Army of the Republic of Macedonia, the representatives of the international community supported the approach that, prior to the initiation of the gradual return of the security forces, mixed ethnic patrols (with Macedonians and Albanians) carrying only personal arms – handguns and batons, test the implementation of the Principle Plan in five villages. Previously, a Pilot Plan was prepared for entering these five villages (Lešok and Tearce in the Tetovo region, Grušino in the Skopje region and Lopate and Opae in the Kumanovo region) on the basis of a thorough security analyses that had been previously carried out in these villages.  Once it was determined that the security situation in these five villages was stable and allowed a secure entry of Police and international community’s representatives, it was decided that the Police would return to these villages. The return was successful and proved the value of the concept for gradual return of the Police in the crisis region, as set forth in the Principle Plan.  The Principle Plan stipulated return of the Police in three phases:   First phase: entering into settlements (villages) assessed as the most stable ones;   Second phase: entering into villages with disturbed security;   Third phase: entering into villages with more complex security situation; Each of these phases was implemented within specific timeframe, within the stipulated six sub-phases of measures and activities: First sub-phase (information and preparations):  Media campaign;   Establishing co-operation with non-governmental organisations;   De-mining of accessing roads;   Assessment of the villages’ status (in terms of the phase in which respective village is to be included);   Deciding on the patrols' structure; Second sub-phase (entering):    Entering the villages;   Establishing contacts with villages’ leading personalities and initiation of co-operation with the population;   Start of patrolling;   Identification of initial problems; Third sub-phase (patrolling):   Evaluation of damages and threats posed by unexploded mines and explosives;   Coordination with the non-governmental organisations’ activities;   Extension of the patrolling duration (extended presence of Police patrols in the villages)   Enforcement of traffic control (without taking full legal measures – only warning and pointing to problems);   Establishment and start of operation of contact offices for direct communication between citizens and the Police);   Preparations for the establishment of Police stations;   Fourth sub-phase (regular Police duties):    Investigation and reporting on criminal actions;   Policing over 24-hour period;   Removal of Police checkpoints and their substitution with ethnically mixed Police patrols;     Fifth sub-phase (broadened Police duties):    Investigation of incidents during late hours;   Establishment of regional Police stations; Sixth sub-phase (24-hour Police patrols without presence of the international observers). After completing the tasks and measures stipulated by the Principle Plan, the Ministry of the Interior has continued its activities and measures for consolidation the rule of law in the former crisis regions. This set of measures was stipulated in a separate document - Plan for Police Conduct After the Implementation of the Principle Plan. The Plan envisaged continued actions aimed at building confidence between the Police and the local population, as well as a commitment for joint efforts to resolve certain difficulties in order to restore citizens’ trust in the institutions of the system. Contribution in this regard was provided by the Community Policing Project under which advisory groups for citizens were established, in which Police officers were ensured with active participation.  Large number of Police facilities in the crisis regions were damaged or fully destroyed in the military activities, so there was emerged need for their reconstruction that would enable a 24-hour Police presence in the villages. Therefore, the Police facilities have been reconstructed and have been put into operation. Construction of a number of new Police stations is in the final stage. Hence, the conditions for policing in these regions will be improved. 5. What are the main elements of the reform of the security forces? 
Since its independence, the Republic of Macedonia has been developing the national security system on the basis of its national interests, in order to respond to the new challenges in the security environment of the Republic of Macedonia.  The design of the internal security system is based on the constitutional principle of the rule of law, and is conditioned by the clearly expressed orientation towards adhering to European standards in the area of Justice and Home Affairs. At the same time, the design of the system of internal security has been strongly influenced by the internal political conditions and the transition changes, which have significantly modified the risks and threats to which the security systems should respond.   On the basis of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia from 1991, a transformation of the internal security system has taken place, which resulted in intensive legislative activities in the years following the independence. A legislative reform has been undertaken – of the criminal, substantive and procedural legislation (Criminal Code, Law on Criminal Procedure), of the laws regulating the operation of the competent administrative bodies (Law on Internal Affairs, Law on Organisation and Operation of the State Administrative Bodies) and of other laws regulating this area. The basic direction and feature of the overall reforms are the strengthening of democratic institutions in the area of security, primarily strengthening the guarantees and mechanisms for protection of human rights and freedoms and ensuring democratic control over the security forces.  In the process of development of adequate security capacities of the Republic of Macedonia, the distinction between the basic elements in the system of public and state security (intelligence and counterintelligence) is of particular importance. In parallel with the adoption of the Law on Internal Affairs in 1995(“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 19/95, 15/97, 55/97, 38/02, 13/03 and 33/03) the Law on the Intelligence Agency was adopted (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 19/95), which created formal and legal conditions for establishment of the Agency. Its basic purpose is collecting data and information of significance for the security and defence of the Republic of Macedonia. Part of the employees of the Ministry of the Interior, who worked in the former State Security Service, and some of employees in other services as well were transferred as staff in the Intelligence Agency. The National Security and Defence Concept (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No.40/03) identifies the risks and threats against the state security, and, inter alia, clearly establishes the foundations of the internal security policy.  The established internal security policy has imposed the need of a new Police structure. It includes establishment of the border Police, i.e., transfer of competences for control and securing of the state border (“green border”) from the Ministry of Defence to the Ministry of the Interior, then establishment of a new organisation and operational methods to combat crime and suppress all its forms, especially the trans-national crime, and also changes in the relations between the Police and the public, for the purposes of joint action aiming at crime prevention. Reforms in the Police of the Republic of Macedonia One of the central issues is needs assessments and defining the basis for a modern model of Police organisation which comprises the competences of the Ministry of the Interior of the Republic of Macedonia and a shift in their focus following the new democratic processes. Therefore, the Ministry of the Interior developed a Strategy for Police Reforms, which is a basis for establishment of a new organisational structure and methods of operation of the Police.  The Strategy for Police Reforms was adopted by the Government of the Republic of Macedonia, at its session of 11.08.2003 (with annexes adopted in October 2003 and January 2005), defining precise obligations which the Ministry of the Interior must fulfil in the process of transformation of the existing model of Police operation. The Strategy for Police Reforms has identified the basic strategic objectives:    Efficiency in the Police operation, through activities aiming towards maintenance of the public order and peace, reduction of the crime rate, institutionalisation of crime prevention, and coordination of activities with other institutions, agencies and with the public;    Fight against organised crime, i.e., ensuring adequate and effective approach to this problem, in conformity to the UN Convention against Trans-national Organised Crime and its Protocols, as well as the relevant standards and best practices of the European Union;    Planning, development and education of the personnel, aiming towards increased efficiency in performance of the functions, through establishment of forms and various levels of education and training in the Police Academy, as well as establishment of an appropriate mechanism for human resources management, with a special emphasis on the selection and recruitment of appropriate professional staff, its development and promotion at the Ministry of the Interior;    Equitable representation of persons belonging to communities which do not constitute the majority in the Republic of Macedonia, in the context of ensuring a harmonised framework for the future of the democracy in the Republic of Macedonia, and enabling development of closer and better integrated relations between the Republic of Macedonia and the European structures, by designing a recruitment employment policy which enables the Police services in general to reflect the composition and distribution of the population in the Republic of Macedonia;    Improved organisation, professionalism and cost-effectiveness in the operation, which requires precise legal definition and distinction of the activities between the criminal Police and their competence at the central, regional and local level, through establishment of relevant control and cooperation; responsibility and motivation of the employees by providing autonomy of the regional organisational units with transfer of part of the competences; technical and technological equipment with modernisation of the communication systems and forensic laboratories;   Enhancement of the regional and international cooperation, through the existing organisational units, aiming towards implementation of the activities and obligations based on the established international relations;    Function of the Police as a service for the public, which implies transformation of the Police from a “force” into a “service” and bringing it closer to the public, as well as applying “community policing”, with  joint action of the Police and the citizens in resolving the security problems and implementation of confidence building measures by way of equitable representation of  non-majority ethnic communities within the Police structure and establishment of the so-called “non-police functions” in order to implement the principles of pragmatism, efficiency and cost-effectiveness and improvement of services that certain organisational units within the Ministry of the Interior offer to the citizens, in the area of various status related rights, aiming at their transfer to the competence of other ministries or bodies. Furthermore, special emphasis is placed on the development of regional cooperation, which is also stressed in the National Strategy for European Integration, in the Chapter on Justice and Home Affairs. The development of the Strategy for Police Reform was supported by the European Commission Justice and Home Affairs Team (ECJHAT), as well as on a project basis (CARDS). Significant support in the implementation of the Police reforms is ensured through the presence of and cooperation with the EU Police Mission in the Republic of Macedonia, PROXIMA. The primary objectives established in the Strategy for Police Reforms are the full transformation of the Ministry of the Interior and the establishment of new organisational structure (see: 24_Annex_04). This structure is oriented towards efficient performance of the tasks, in conformity to precisely determined level of functioning (strategic, operational and tactical). Therefore, in order to ensure efficient implementation of the basic principles of modern Police operation, pursuant to the Strategy of Police Reforms, the Ministry of the Interior will be composed of:   Services responsible for coordination, international cooperation and public relations of the Ministry, as well as establishment of the general directions for implementation of activities of the Ministry of the Interior;   Bureau for Public Security consisting of services of advisory nature, in charge of strategic, conceptual planning and establishment of the general directions and operational standards;   The operational services (Central Police Services, Border Police and Regional Police Services) in charge of the operational tasks of the Ministry of the Interior, by implementing specific activities and actions, aiming towards implementation of the basic functions of the Ministry of the Interior Directorate for State Security and Counterintelligence On the basis of the analysis of the document, and having in mind the objectives of the Police reform process, as well as the need to precisely distinguish between its competences and the competencies of certain organisational units that have functions related to the system of public security, it has been concluded that it is necessary to adequately restructure the Directorate, and especially some of its organisational units. Therefore, the Ministry of the Interior has established a special Working Group, which works on restructuring of the Directorate for State Security and Counterintelligence, and especially on precise establishment of the competences and of the cooperation between the Directorate for State Security and Counterintelligence and the Bureau for Public Security. Additional element of the reforms is development of coordination within the Police, but also establishment of mechanisms for coordination with the other law enforcement services.  Police Academy  The Police Academy is a state-financed higher education institution in the area of security, educating personnel for the needs of the Ministry of the Interior, other state authorities, as well as other organisations, institutions and legal entities performing activities in the area of security. It establishes a modern and comprehensive system of personnel education, as well as for acquiring higher education, professional degree – specialist, academic degree – master, and academic degree – doctor of sciences, as well as continuous education of persons who have already acquired a degree. Transparency in the process of implementation of Police reforms In the framework of the overall process of Police reforms, the Working Group for Implementation of the Police Reforms, respecting the principle of transparency, works on the implementation of an appropriate information campaign. The employees at the Ministry of the Interior and its regional organisational units have been informed about the process of Police reforms at regular working meetings with the representatives of the Working Group. At the same time, they are actively involved in the process of implementation of the activities within the working bodies and structures of the Working Group. In that manner, a special information bulletin, for the employees at the Ministry and its regional organisational units, is published. As envisaged, the information bulletin will be regularly updated and distributed in the future stages of the implementation of the Police reform process.  Furthermore, the basic data and information related to the Strategy for Police Reforms are available at the web-site of the Ministry of the Interior, and regular press conferences are conducted, as well as organised panel debates for the employees at the Ministry and the general public.   Reforms in the Army of the Republic of Macedonia The transformation of the system of national security requires parallel and complementary legislative and implementation activities in the systems of the defence and internal security. Such activities have been directed towards clear identification of the competences of all entities, as well as towards coordination and cooperation to ensure integrity of the entire system of national security. The Defence Law (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 42/01 and 05/03) established in detail the competences and obligations of all entities in this area, as well as the deployment of the Army for civilian purposes. The participation of the Army in international missions is also defined in this Law.  On the basis of Article 36, paragraph 5 of the Law on Government of the Republic of Macedonia, (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 59/00), the Government of the Republic of Macedonia, at its session of 10.05 2004, adopted the Programme for Transformation of the Defence and the Army of the Republic of Macedonia (Strategic Defence Overview, Stage III, Skopje, May 2004), on the basis of which the Army of the Republic of Macedonia is transformed into a more efficient military force, capable of defending the country from all potential threats. In this respect, the fight against terrorism, along with the primary task to defend the territorial sovereignty and integrity, is a fundamental task of the Army. Main elements in the Army reform in the long run are creating forces capable of responding to the new security challenges upon the territory of the Republic of Macedonia, as well as enhancing the capacities for active contribution towards the collective security systems. On the basis of the available resources, a new structure of forces of the Army of the Republic of Macedonia has been developed, envisaged to be operational and completely professional as of 01.01.2008. The number of commands and units has been reduced, which presupposes reduction of the personnel of the active forces – from 12.858 to 7696, and of the reserve forces form 16.000 to 4.850 persons. 6. How is police primacy in dealing with internal security ensured? What is the legal framework and how is it implemented? What arrangements exist for calling up army resources under police command in specific crisis situations? 
The supremacy of the Police in dealing with the internal security is established in the legal system of the Republic of Macedonia, as well as in the adopted strategic documents.  The competence of the Ministry of the Interior established by law clearly locates the role of the Police in the internal security of the state.  Pursuant to the Law on Organisation and Operation of the State Administrative Bodies (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 58/00 and 44/02) the Ministry of the Interior performs the activities related to the enforcement of the system of the state and public security.The Article 1 of the Law on Internal Affairs (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 1//95, 55/97, 38/02, 33/03 and 19/04), defines the role of this body as aiming towards protection of life, personal security and property of citizens, prevention of crime, detection and apprehension of perpetrators of criminal offences and their hand over to the competent bodies, protection of human rights and freedoms, guaranteed by the Constitution, prevention of violent destruction of the democratic institutions established by the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia.The same Law defines the competences in the area of maintenance of public order and peace, prevention of incitement to national, racial or religious hatred or intolerance, securing of certain persons and facilities, regulation and control of traffic on the roads, and other issues related to the traffic safety, protection of the state border, control of crossing of state border and stay inside the border zone, residence and movement of aliens, establishment and resolution of border incidents and other violations of the state border, placement, control and maintenance of the marks demarcating the borderline on land and water.Regarding the rights and duties of the Ministry of the Interior in the area of defence, the personnel of the Ministry, with regards to performance of military and other obligations in the area of defence, are, as a rule, military deployed within the Ministry of the Interior. Pursuant to the Law, in circumstances of war or state of emergency, for protection of the security in the Republic of Macedonia or maintenance of the public order and peace when it is violated to a greater extent, the Ministry calls upon persons with a military deployment schedule and working obligations at the Ministry, i.e. members of the reserve forces, which are deployed within the Ministry for as long as the reasons due to which they were called upon last. Pursuant to the Defence Law, the President of the Republic of Macedonia, who is also the Supreme Commander of the armed forces, enacts documents for the use of the Army and issues the orders for the use of the Army.   On the other hand, the Law establishes that the Government of the Republic of Macedonia, orders the use of the Police in the state of war, as support to the Army. The Defence Law (Article 40) also regulates the participation of the Army in the removal of consequences of state of emergency, whereby the order is issued by the President of the State, while the instructions on the manner of participation are issued by the Minister of Defence.  The National Concept on Security and Defence (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 40/03), identifies the security risks and threats, as well as areas and instruments of the national security policy. The Concept also establishes the policy of internal security, while the system of crisis management is especially elaborated, in which respect the focus is placed on the coordination aimed at relevant assessment, prevention and resolution of specific crisis situations.  The Strategic Defence Review (enacted in October 2003) in relation to the treatment of the implications of the internal security policy on the defence policy, prescribes an obligation for the Ministry of Defence and the Army of the Republic of Macedonia to plan the provision of support to the civil authorities, as well as to participate in deterring the risks and threats against the internal security of the Republic of Macedonia. Here, especially terrorism is identified as a risk for which mutual support is necessary. Furthermore, it is established that the Army of the Republic of Macedonia provides support to the activities of the Police in dealing with such threats, placing its forces and capacities, intelligence infrastructure and the specialised personnel at the disposal of the Police.   On the basis of the aforementioned strategic national documents, further improvement to the national legislation are foreseen, aiming at establishment of precise solutions for action in specific crisis situations.  
7. Is there an Action Plan for the reform of the Police, including proper budgetary allocations? What is its stage of implementation? 
The Government of the Republic of Macedonia adopted the Action Plan for the Implementation of Police Reform on 10.01.2005.  The development of the Action Plan was entrusted to the Strategic Body for Management of the Police Reform Process, composed of officers of the Ministry of the Interior from various services. There are several subgroups which work on certain aspects of implementation of the reform process.   It is worth mentioning that the original version of the plan was finalised in January 2004, but due to the need of additional harmonisation, especially within the Project for Police Reforms, the adoption of the Action Plan by the Government had been postponed. Additionally, harmonisation of several ongoing projects in support to the reform process was needed. However, considering that many tasks were already established in the Strategy and the Draft Plan, the implementation of the defined activities was carried out in parallel with the finalisation of the document.  The Action Plan contains: the implementation concept, the fiscal impact analysis and the foreseen activities, grouped by areas. The foreseen activities are the following:    Identification and operational development of the competences of the organisational units within the Ministry of the Interior, establishment of the internal organisational structure of the Ministry oriented towards efficient performance of the professional obligations and description of the jobs, as well as building an information structure appropriate to the strategic needs of the process of management, operational planning and management of the tactical operations and objectives Implementation status:    The internal organisational structure of the Ministry has been defined and it clearly differentiates the police posts, at the same time separating the strategic, operational and tactical level.   The description of competences of organisational units have been defined as well as description of duties of the central and regional police services, including the structures connected directly to the Minister. The same procedure for the Border Police is under way. Proper allocation of human resources (personnel), i.e., establishment of the system for personnel development, and especially building professional staff, its continuous advancement, establishment of rules for career development and motivation for the employees; Implementation status:   Breakdowns of posts and number of employees in the central and regional police offices have been prepared including those for the envisaged structures connected directly to the Minister. The same procedure shall be applied to the Border Police. With regard to the Department for Organised Crime the allocation has been carried out on the basis of the Amendments to the Rulebook on the Organisation and Operation of the Ministry and the Rulebook on the Systematisation of Posts. Identification of needs to modify the legislation, aimed towards creating the necessary legal prerequisites for operation of the police and the methodology of operation (adoption of new, as well as amending the existing legislation necessary for the successful implementation of the reform), as well as establishment of procedures regulating the relations and procedures between the organisational units on the one hand and approximation of the national legislation to the EU acquis in the area of home affairs and its implementation within the legal system of the Republic of Macedonia, on the other hand; Implementation status:   The complete legislation necessary for the implementation of reforms has been identified and it envisages the adoption of new laws and by-laws and amending the existing ones. The time-frame for the adoption of the laws has also been defined (all should be adopted in 2005); while the by-laws shall be adopted six months after the respective laws have entered into force. There are approximately 100 pieces of legislation.   The Law on Weapons (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 7/05) and the Law on Personal Data Protection (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 07/05) have been adopted.   The Law on Interception of Communication is in parliamentary procedure.   The drafts of the Law on the Police, Law on Residence and Movement of Aliens, and the Law on Surveillance of the State Border have already been prepared. Special treatment of the issue of fight against  organised crime, for which it is necessary to establish adequate formal, legal and institutional capacities aimed at operational development of the activities in this area and ensuring adequate and effective dealing with this issue, in conformity with the European standards and experiences (establishing of a precise definition of the notion of organised crime, reorganisation of the structure and the functions, strengthening of the research capacities, as well as establishment of the organisational units in charge of the fight against the organised crime, and strengthening of their capacities); Implementation status:   Amendments to the Rulebook on Organisation and Operation of the Ministry and the Rulebook on the Systematisation of Posts was adopted;   A Guideline for the Procedure on Conducting an Internal Public Vacancy Announcement in the Ministry was adopted;   The managerial staff (undersecretary and heads), as well as executives in organisational units of the Department for Organised Crime were appointed.   In accordance with a Programme, training is carried out in the Police Academy. The training for managerial staff has completed, while trainings for employees is under way and it is carried out in two groups;   The Department started to operate on 24.01.2005. Defining the material and technical means (finances, logistics and facilities) necessary for the implementation of the reform, and analysis of the spatial, material and technical needs of the organisational units within the new organisational structure, according to the previously established status of affairs in the Ministry regarding this issue, as well as the financial calculation for material and technical equipping and for facilities, i.e., establishment of projects for material and technical equipping and for facilities and defining the specific priorities in this segment. Implementation status:   An analysis of the spatial, financial and technical resources has been conducted;   An assessment for the necessary equipment has been made on the basis of the current state and the exigencies of the reform process   An assessment of financial implications has also been made. Full implementation of the document Strategy for Police Reforms is expected not later than the end of 2005, whereby specific timeframe was determined to implement the necessary steps in individual segments. A system of monitoring of the implementation of the Action Plan was envisaged, according to which the Ministry of the Interior will inform the Government of the Republic of Macedonia about the implementation of the Plan, each six months. In this area, the establishment of the institutional cooperation between the Ministry of the Interior and the relevant ministries and institutions in the state is of special importance, in order to provide for efficiency in the operation and coordination of activities between these institutions. The aforementioned activities are supported by the obligations based on the document “Concrete Measures-Activities for Fight Against Organised Crime”, adopted by the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and supported by the Council of the European Union, with the participation of the Ministry of Justice, the Public Prosecutor’s Office of the Republic of Macedonia, the courts, the Ministry of Finance, the Customs Administration, the State Committee for Prevention of Corruption, and the Associations of Judges and of the Prosecutors. Fiscal impact of the police reforms process The implementation of the police reform process will have a fiscal impact, and the Ministry of the Interior undertakes specific steps to determine it precisely. Namely, according to the established parameters to determine the financial means necessary for the implementation of the police reforms (total number of population, basic elements of the new organisational structure in the Ministry of the Interior, in conformity with the Police Reforms Strategy, the number of present personnel at the Ministry, personnel needed according to the new organisational setup, etc). The Ministry of the Interior has prepared a global fiscal impact analysis of the process of general improvement of police services, the cost of which is assessed between 100.000.000 and 120.000.000 EUR.  These financial means would be necessary for the supplying of the Ministry of the Interior with modern and sophisticated equipment, provision of adequate premises, and procurement and equipping of the police with adequate IT equipment and software, telecommunications equipment, instruments for the forensics, special equipment for the special investigative techniques, modern transport vehicles, personal, protective and other specific equipment; building, upgrading, repair and leasing of facilities; equipping of the facilities and education of the personnel. Taking into consideration the establishment of the Organised Crime Department as the first priority in the process of police reforms implementation, a fiscal impact assessment of the priority needs of material and technical means for 2005 was made, amounting to 39.300.000 EUR.  Part of the finances necessary for the implementation of the police reforms process are provided by budgetary allocations of the Republic of Macedonia, whereby in parallel the Ministry of the Interior will work on initiating and implementing specific projects through the programmes and instruments of the European Union and on a bilateral basis.  8. What measures have been taken to ensure an increased awareness within the security forces of issues such as human rights, non-discrimination and community policing methods? 
In accordance with Article 9 of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia (Chapter 2 - Fundamental freedoms and rights of the individual and the citizen), citizens of the Republic of Macedonia are equal in their freedoms and rights, regardless of gender, race, skin colour, ethnic or social origin, political and religion beliefs, or property and social status. Within the Police reform training, the Ministry of the Interior has set a priority task to train members of Ministry in issues regarding human freedoms and rights. The training “Human Rights and Police” is implemented through three-day seminars for employees in the police departments within the Ministry of the Interior. The Ministry, with the assistance provided by the OSCE and Helsinki Committee for the Protection of Human Rights, since 2002, has trained 4150 Police and criminal Police members, which constitutes 47,50% of the total number of Police officers. For the successful implementation of the training, the Ministry uses specialised manuals prepared by both the Ministry and the OSCE, as well as those prepared within the Council of Europe’s project “Human Rights and Police 1997/2000”. In the framework of “Human Rights and Police” training, encompassed are issues of Non-Discriminatory Policing and Democratic Execution of Police Duties. The seminars cover also the following educational topics:   Introduction in human rights;   Treatment of general human rights issues and police conduct;   Deprivation of freedom (arrest) and detention;   Use of force;   Matters that must be taken in consideration prior to interrogation;   Fair trial and presumption of innocence;  Non-discriminatory policing;   Arbitrary intrusion in private life;   Democratic implementation of Police duties;   Policing in a multiethnic society and   Police ethics.  Issues related to human rights are included in the curriculum of the Police Academy through the educational topics and as a separate subject within the higher education. The Human Rights and Police training has been implemented on four levels through the process of basic and specialised training, management training and through a separate subject, in co-operation with experts from the Ministry of the Interior, Police Academy, OSCE and other institutions in Macedonia. The Ministry of the Interior has also been implementing expert training of its police officers based on the Pre-service and In-service Training Programme (No. 192-37872&1 from 24.11.1998) that is still in force. As a result of amendments to many laws and by-laws regulating the operations of Police stations and departments, a need emerged for a new Programme on Additional Professional Training and Specialisation of Police employees. Senior officers have selected thematic units subject to the Programme's implementation, based on contents that they believe are current and important in their work.  The new Programme, after its reviewing and inclusion of the relevant suggestions by the Workgroup for Police Reforms within the Ministry of the Interior, was adopted in December 2004 and submitted for implementation in the Ministry’s organisational units. The Programme aims to provide curricula for a continuous and expert training of police members in Police Stations and Police Departments for the purpose of the successful implementation of duties within the Bureau for Public Security. The Programme encompasses provisions and thematic contents with regard to Police conduct (laws and by-laws), with emphasis in practical application of legal authorisation (Police tactics). Furthermore, the Programme includes special physical training concerning motor function capabilities as well as combined elements in wrestling sports and skills adapted for the Police (self-defence, karate, judo, boxing, and other sports). Non-Discriminatory Policing and Democratic Execution of Police Duties are special topics within the additional training for all Police members.  The establishment of multiethnic Police forces has been a step forward in raising the awareness of Police regarding non-discriminatory conduct and differences among citizens. The challenge, necessity and inevitability of operating in multiethnic environment has made multiethnic Police units, through every-day communication with colleagues and citizens, understand the sensibility of non-discrimination and the necessity of equal treatment of citizens while enforcing police authorities.  Co-operation between Police and citizens has been a commitment of the Ministry of the Interior, which resulted from the strategic goal of the Republic of Macedonia to approximate to European standards in all areas, including security.  The Ministry of the Interior, in accordance with its legal authorities and in co-operation with international organisations, following the successful implementation of the Principal Plan for Return of the Security Forces in the Crisis Regions, the return of the majority of internally displaced persons and the return of security forces after the establishment of interim Police stations with multiethnic patrols, has carried out large-scale and intensive activities in mutual confidence building and partnership between the Police and local population. As a result of discussions and identification of Macedonia's needs, numerous recommendations regarding communication, partnership, recommendations for media, etc. have been adopted and later on used in conferences in the former crisis regions: Kumanovo, Skopje, Tetovo and Gostivar. The concept is being carried out through Citizens’ Advisory Groups, which held regular meetings on local level, municipality, area, village, etc, among official representatives (mayors, civil society, non-governmental organisations, local media, religious communities, local population, local offices of the ministries’ or local institutions), OSCE field offices' representatives and local Police representatives. These meetings are a long-term formal forum where issues and problems of mutual interest are discussed, thus agreeing on measures for resolution of those problems and looking for local solutions to local problems, which is an achievement of the whole community, regardless of political or ethnic affiliation. In addition, Advisory Groups as a simple form of co-operation with local population should enable the Police to carry out all of their duties, thus promoting it as a service that, depending on citizens' expectations and needs, builds a more secure environment, i.e. a service open, transparent and accountable to citizens. At the meetings, the Police have elaborated on the amendments to the Criminal Code; the action on voluntary hand over and collection of weapons; as well as human rights issues and Police conduct in relation to human rights.  Given the new approach of Police conduct, Citizens' Advisory Groups have been envisioned as a partnership concept that shall strengthen relations between citizens and Police, as well as improve communication, exchange of information and the overall quality of living.  Once the concept of the Advisory groups has been accepted, the Ministry of the Interior has appointed 32 community policing officers. These officers are from the Internal Affairs Sectors in Skopje, Kumanovo, Tetovo, Gostivar, Ohrid, Veles and from Internal Affairs Sections in Struga and Debar, who were provided with modular training by the Ministry and the OSCE's Police Development Department.  The training encompassed three modules (chapters), carried out as formal training in a classroom, while the fourth part of the training was carried out through a one-week professional specialisation in selected Police stations in the Netherlands.   The implementation of these measures began after 15.09.2002, and the groups' effective operations started in the second quarter of 2003, when Citizens’ Advisory Groups in Skopje, Tetovo, Gostivar, Kumanovo, Ohrid, Veles, Struga and Debar were established by local representatives, community policing officers and representatives of the Ministry on central and local level, in co-operation with OSCE field teams.  Having in mind that the aforementioned areas were former crisis regions, most of the discussions at the beginning of Advisory Groups‘ operations have been related to the need of communication and co-operation between the Police and local population, aimed at resolving problems related to inter-ethnic distrust.  During the initial meetings, discussions have mostly been focused on security issues and certain problems of local population related to Police enforcement measures (such as arrest without warrant, cases of abuse of persons detained for interrogation in Police stations, etc.). At the same time, local citizens have requested employment in the Police in order to build mutual confidence and enable the Police patrol in all areas. Even though the co-operation between Police and local population was still not satisfactory in the first half of 2003, citizens have expressed support to Police actions against notorious criminals and criminal groups, which was also subject of discussion at Citizen Advisory Groups' meetings in 2004.  Discussions at such meetings do not carry the burden of post-crisis problems anymore, but are rather focused on actual local problems and current events. Hence, the Police have provided information on legal provisions related to the organisation of the early presidential elections and measures they have undertaken. With regard to current problems, participants at meetings proposed solutions and security measures that need to be undertaken in the regions. The Police have presented statistics on crime rates and information on the most common types of burglaries and robberies in the area, and exchanged opinions with local population on how they may contribute to the prevention or resolution of such crimes. 
9. Please describe how coordination between municipal councils and the local heads of police is carried out. Are there any problems of coordination in practice? 
The Ministry of the Interior is organised on a territorial principle, which means that it carries out its operations of law enforcement through 12 Internal Affairs Sectors operating as regional units of the Ministry. The Internal Affairs Sector IS on a territorial basis and is a territorial service for direct enforcement of police operations. The Government upon the proposal of the Minister of the Interior determines the seat and territory of each Sector. The Internal Affairs Sector has been defined as an operational organisation of the Ministry and is vertically connected to it, while the sectors co-operate on a horizontal level and are organised on the basis of the region’s size, population, number of criminal offences and misdemeanours, and other criteria. The Sectors are managed by Heads. In accordance with the Law on Local Self-Government (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 05/02), the implementation of the decision on appointments of local Heads shall begin following the local elections in March 2005. Pursuant to Article 36 of this Law, the Council appoints a Head that administers the Ministry’s local branch. In accordance with Articles 20-a and 20-b of the Law Amending the Law on Internal Affairs (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 38/02), the local head of police is elected by Municipal Councils which fall under the jurisdiction of the Ministry’s local branch, from a list containing at least three candidates proposed by the Minister. At least one of the candidates must belong to the community that represents the majority population in the municipalities. If the Councils of respective municipalities do not select any of the candidates within 15 days from the day of the proposal, the Minister shall propose a second list that contains at least three new candidates among whom at least one must be from the majority community in the municipalities.  If after the second procedure a candidate is not elected, within 15 days from the submission of the list of candidates, the Minister, in consultation with the Government of the Republic of Macedonia, shall appoint the local head of police either from the candidates on the two previously proposed lists or from three other candidates proposed by the Councils of interested municipalities. The Minister shall retain his/her authority for the dismissal of the local head of police in accordance with the Law.  The Local Police Head shall inform interested municipalities on a regular basis and upon their request about issues related to public security and road traffic safety. The municipal councils and local police heads shall co-operate through contacts and meetings on issues concerning the security situation of the region under the respective jurisdiction, public peace and order, traffic, and other current problems related to infrastructure and utilities. Practical experiences demonstrate certain coordination problems between municipal councils and local police heads, especially during security forces’ attempt to return to crisis regions after the security crisis in 2001, and in the course of the implementation of ”new approach” concepts of confidence building between the police and local population. With the continuous development of the concept of co-operation between the police and citizens in confidence building, in defining local problems and in reaching joint solutions for them, citizens’ advisory groups have a key role in raising awareness on the need of co-operation. In this manner, some of the problems have already been resolved. 10. What percentage of the police force has received further training over the last 5 years? Is such training obligatory? What is the average amount of training and where and by whom is it offered? 
The on-going training of the employees in the Ministry of the Interior is carried out on several levels and in several different forms. The training objective is to create a profile of police capability and culture, as well as a high level of initiative, professionalism and speciality in executing the police duty. The Police Code of Ethics adopted in 2003 establishes that the police training, in accordance with its objective and competences, is based upon the principles of democracy, rule of law and respect of human freedoms and rights, as well as principles of fighting racism and xenophobia (Articles 26-30). The basic training of the police officer is open and transparent to the society, at the same time accompanied by regular training within the service. If there is a need, a special training in security management (management in training), is provided. The Police Academy of the Republic of Macedonia is the only institutional form of police education. The Law on the Police Academy (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No 40/03) regulates the training of personnel for the Ministry and other government bodies, as well as for other organisations, bodies and legal entities that operate in the field of security – articles 2 and 3 of the Law. Hence, the Academy provides training for the following:    Acquiring a four year university degree;   Acquiring a one year vocational degree of a specialist;     Acquiring a two-year master’s degree;     Continued education of persons with an already acquired degree in other institutions: elementary police education and training; special education and training; and education and training in security management.    Acquiring a Ph.D. degree.  The Police Academy carries out its activities on two educational levels: university education and continuous education. University education is divided in graduate (four-year studies) and post-graduate (vocational and academic studies). In addition, the Academy provides continued education of persons with already acquired degree by providing elementary police education and training, special education and training, and education and training in security management. The elementary police education is a two-year academic programme, including six months of practical field training, while the length of special and management courses depends on their programmes. The Police Academy provides courses in basic police training from 6 months to 1 year with the following contents:    Police duty in democratic society and legal framework;    Police conduct and legal framework;    Criminalistics and criminology;    Defence techniques (self-defence) with basic physical training and skill testing;    General education (Macedonian language and orthography; foreign language, information technology, telecommunications and first aid);    Weapons handling; shooting and bivouacking;    Practical drills and field training;    Current issues in police conduct improvement. The target group of the foregoing training are persons with a secondary education degree (not older than 25). The subsequent course is Basic Training of Border Police for a period of three months that can be divided in the following curricula:   Basic police training;   Criminology;   Police conduct and defence police techniques. The target group of the foregoing training are persons with a secondary education degree and already employed in the Army of the Republic of Macedonia.  The third course is Police Border Management Training covering basic training in police, legal, criminology and management areas. The lectures at this course are given by senior officers from regional border police centres, and target groups are members of the army’s border brigade.  The fourth course is a one-week training of Instructors for the police reception on the ground.  At the time being the Police Academy conducts training in the framework of the police’s continued education, with courses in basic training (for a period of 12 months of which 9 months of training takes place at the premises of the Police Academy and the rest is a field training), attended by 355 police officers from the Ministry of the Interior. 1. Following the signing of the Ohrid Framework Agreement and within the thorough reforms in the Ministry of the Interior, the Ministry has been required to organise training for the current staff as a main target group. The training is carried out through seminars in “Human Rights and Police” and “Police Conduct in Democratic Society”. OSCE and the Helsinki Committee for Human Rights as partners in training have offered assistance.  The literature used for the training is part of the Council of Europe project “Human Rights and Police 1997/2000”, and “Human Rights and Police after 2000” (Instructors' Manual; Torture Prevention Committee; Discussion Tools; Reference Handbook; Police Handbook; Video tape); as well as literature prepared by the Ministry of the Interior, OSCE and the Helsinki Committee (Police and Human Rights – Police Training Handbook).  As of October 2002 to the present, 4200 police and criminal police members have been trained at three-day seminars, which comprise 48% of the total number of police officers. These three-day seminars are still being conducted as an additional training for the police and all the members of the police force will pass this training. 2. OSCE is also a partner in the police training “Identification of Illegal Narcotics” conducted for 2.687 police officers (33,9%). The training continues and the target groups are the police and the criminal police. 3. From 2001 to 2004, the Ministry of the Interior and OSCE have carried out three-month courses, while currently they are conducting one-year courses with an emphasis on the establishment of multiethnic police. A number of 1.812 police officers (22,8%) have been trained with a mixed ethnic composition. 4. With regard to the Border Police, 821 officers (54% of the total number of Border Police employees) have been trained at the Police Academy on three-month seminars. 5. The six-month course at the Police Academy on training 100 inspectors (from different ethnic communities) has finished. 6. Pursuant to Article 18 of the Code of Police Ethics, the police has been organised in accordance with principles of Community Policing, which provides for the establishment of relations between the police and the public. This, in turn, facilitates the police’s co-operation with other bodies, such as local-self government units, non-governmental organisations and citizens. The United States International Criminal Investigative Training Assistance Program (ICITAP) and the OSCE Mission have offered assistance in establishing and developing of the foregoing mode of police work and conduct. A number of 110 police members (senior staff) have self-trained themselves to operate in communities, as well as the Bicycle Police Team comprising 10 police officers. The self-training course is consisted of 6 Modules: Why Changes Are Necessary; Implementation of the New Police Conduct in Co-operation with the Community; Contribution and Participation of the Community; Building Partnerships; Resolving Problems; and Progress. Since 2002, the Ministry of the Interior and OSCE have trained 3.000 police officers (37,8% of the total number) on one-day seminars on: police and community co-operation; what that co-operation means; problem resolution and partnership with local communities; and reactive, proactive and traditional execution of police duties. The Ministry and OSCE have also realised a special training in executing police duties in communities on two-day seminars for 180 senior staff of the Ministry, which is 1,7% of the total number of employees. Thirty two police members have received special training in policing within local communities. The seminar covered the following topics: Analysing the need for changes; developing skills for communication with the local population; and developing partnership techniques. The U.S. ICITAP team and Ministry’s coordinators have carried out a Pilot Project on the Police Work with the Community in the Kavadarci Department of Internal Affairs by training 25 instructors (police officers as a target group) and a Bicycle Police Team in Kavadarci DIA comprising 4 police officers. 7. In co-operation with OSCE and the Helsinki Committee, the Ministry has also carried out two seminars on human rights for 25 senior officials of the Ministry and regional offices. 8. The Ministry has been actively co-operating with non-governmental organisations, both domestic and international, by organising workshops on topics related to police conduct and misconduct, domestic violence, multiethnic society and police. Members of both the police and criminal police have attended these workshops. 9. The Ombudsman has also been part of instructor’s training (a total of 30 instructors), organised by the Ministry and OSCE for the implementation of the Code of Police Ethics—the citizens’ complaints and the role of the Ombudsman and the police. 10. Many materials that had already been part of seminars, have been published and are at the disposal of police officers. Thus, six thousand printed copies of Set of Regulations Related to Human Rights have been published, including laws, rulebooks, legal provisions, etc. Financial support has been provided from the OSCE and the Canadian Agency for Development. 11. In co-operation with the Office of the High Commissioner for Human Rights and the non-governmental organisation Information Centre for Civil Society, and with funding provided by the Dutch Organisation Pax Christi, the Ministry has published 10.000 copies in Macedonian and 1.500 in Albanian of the Pocket Handbook of Police Conduct Pursuant to Domestic and International Human Rights Standards on Law Enforcement, that have been disseminated to all Ministry employees and are part of the literature used for additional and continued police training. 12. The Council of Europe in co-operation with the Police Academy has organised training for senior staff in the Ministry and the Police Academy on Police Management, which was passed by 12 senior officers.  13.  Since 2005 all members of police will undergo continued additional annual training (preparations are currently underway) On-job Training, which will cover topics in police work and new legislation. Instructors will be selected from the ranks of Ministry's senior officials, judges, public prosecutors, PROXIMA, and from other areas. The instructors shall be especially trained to carry out the training. 14. The Training Programme is presently being prepared for all police members with regard to specific situations in public order and peace when it has been violated to a larger extent. It shall start at the beginning of 2005 and all police members are a target group. 15. In 2004 the Ministry sent two high police officials to Sweden at the Centre of Peace Operations Education, to be trained in peace operations and peace support operations with a UN mandate and led by NATO, EU and OSCE. 16. In 2004 the complete police personnel have been trained at a one-day additional training by senior staff in each police station on the contents and responsibilities arising from the Rules on Conduct and Inter-Personal Relations of Employees with Special Tasks and Authorities at the Ministry of the Interior. 17. Training and education of the Special Task Unit (STU) and the Special Unit for Rapid Deployment (SURD).  The training of the Special Task Unit is being conducted on the basis of the Rulebook on the Conditions and Procedures of Deployment of the Special Task Unit. The Rulebook specifies the conditions and procedures of the Unit’s operations, rights and duties of employees, deployment in the course of duty, and termination of Unit’s operations. The expert training of the Unit’s members is carried out in accordance with an annual programme, adopted pursuant to Article 5 of the Rulebook on Permanent Professional Training in Accordance with Programmes and Plans adopted by the Minister of the Interior.  The training of STU members has been envisaged as basic and advanced. Basic training encompasses: Programme for Basic and Expert Physical Training; Expert Police Training and Weapons; Sniper Training; Training for Operating All Types of Motor Vehicles; Operating and Undertaking Operative and Tactical Measures in Winter Conditions; Repeating and Improving Skills in Skiing and Tasks Related to Carrying Out Rescue Operations in Winter Conditions and During Natural Disasters; High-Altitude Fitness Training; Beginners’ Alpine Training; Utilisation of Basic Alpine Techniques; Spatial Orientation and Cartography ; Basic Sanitary Training; Programme for Organisation and Implementation of Training on Security of Persons, Facilities, Transportations, Public Events, etc.; Programme for Organisation and Implementation of Shooting with Personal and Formation Weapons and All Other Types of Weapons that the STU Utilises.  Advanced special training of the TSU consists of Advanced Alpine Training; Diving and Under-Water Activities; Advanced Sanitary Training; Special Police Operations Programme - Specialised Training; Programmes on Organising Trainings in Explosives  for the Purpose of Braking-in (breaking through doors, windows, walls, etc.) and Counter-Measures in Case of Explosives Incident; Programmes for Organising Training in Security of Persons, Facilities, Transportations, Public Events, etc.; and Programme for Organising the Selection Process of Hiring New Members of the STU and Implementing a Selected Course for Their Training. A target group of the basic training are all STU members, while target groups of advanced training are a selected number of members according to field of operation.  Training of STU members is also organised through seminars in Macedonia and other countries, such as: International Committee of the Red Cross – Dissemination of Humanitarian Law – in Slovenia and Macedonia in the 1 and 2 stage; Specialised GIPN (Groupe d’Intervention de la Police Nationale), France; Specialised BRI France (sniper tactics); Sniper Training 1 and 2 stage (advanced); Specialised 1 and 2 stage Training; Diving Seminar OVD, DAIFUN and DAICAM; Alpine Training 1st and 2nd stage; Specialised Training USA 2003; VIP and GAP Seminar, France; Scouting 1 and 2 with SAS; Explosives; Seminar on Sanitary Issues, Sarajevo 2002; Trafficking in Narcotic Drugs; Anti-Terrorism, Egypt and Hungary; Explosives, USA 2001; Explosives, Turkey 2004, Specialised RAID, France (two seminars); RAID Negotiations, France; Surveillance and Shadowing, etc. Target group of these seminars are the junior and senior staff.  The Special Rapid Deployment Unit is trained in accordance with the Annual Programme of SURD Training, as well as on the basis of studies in specific areas. In addition, seminars are also considered special training, and such have been carried out in: the USA, New Mexico on Border Police; USA. Resolution of Hostage Crises; Restoring Public Peace and Order After it Has Been Disturbed to a Larger Extent; Sweden and the UK, 2004 – Weapons of Mass Destruction; Crisis Situation and Command Management – the US Embassy and International Committee of the Red Cross. Target groups of these seminars are selected employees depending on their scope of work, while all members of SURD have been trained in Human Rights and the Police.  18. As a result of the Ministry’s co-operation with the non-governmental sector in 2004 – the Friedrich Ebert Foundation, Macedonia Office, and the Building Peace and Democracy Initiative within the project Partners in Peace and Prevention – the Ministry has promoted the concept of conflict containment and early warning by notifying local authorities and senior police staff. A survey was also conducted of all members of the project to acquire feedback. Fifty members of the police were part of the project. The project’s objective was also to obtain feedback on the new decentralisation process that shall generate a number of changes in the Republic of Macedonia. It was also intended to raise the level of local authorities’ responsibility, including the police.  19. In 2004 the Ministry, in co-operation with the non-governmental sector (the Citizens’ Association - Centre for Open Communication), has organised workshops on The Police in Multiethnic Environment, with an emphasis on the challenge, necessity and inevitability of the police's work in multiethnic environment. A total of 50 police members have attended these workshops. 20. From 1999 to 2001, the Ministry in co-operation with the Open Society Institute Foundation (OSI) has carried out seminars on sexual abuse of women and children, targeting 150 police and criminal police members.  21. In 2001 the Ministry in co-operation with UNICEF has carried out a seminar for 70 police officers, mainly targeting police and criminal police departments, with the topic Training in Juvenile Delinquency, Children’s Rights and Abuse of Children. 22. In 2003 the Ministry in co-operation with OSI-Macedonia held two seminars for 45 administration personnel of the Internal Affairs Sector in Skopje on domestic violence. Target group were members of police and criminal police.  23. In 2004, as a result of the co-operation between OSI and the Ministry, two seminars were held covering topics of sexual abuse of children and women and domestic violence, for 240 police officers in the Police Unit (PU) and Criminal Police Department (CPD).  Pursuant to the Collective Agreement of the Ministry of the Interior, Chapter 5 and articles 91-92, the Ministry's employees have a right and duty to attend professional training, and thus additional training and specialisation has been a strategic goal. The police training and education is a continuous process, and the foregoing percentages are changeable depending on the number of police officers presently under training. 11. Please detail the inspection and internal control systems to ensure fairness, transparency and accountability in the security forces, at all levels, particularly at the central level and among senior officers. 
In order to secure equity, transparency and accountability of security forces on all levels, and especially on the central level among the senior civil servants, the Ministry of the Interior is implementing systems of inspections and internal control. The Ministry implements these systems in order to adhere to constitutional principles, laws and by-laws that regulate the operations of the Ministry, as well as to apply the single working methodology for the respect and protection of human rights of all people regardless of their skin colour, gender, ethnic, racial, religious or political affiliation. Chapter IV of the Code of Police Ethics (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 03/04) Police and Criminal Justice Authorities, Article 16, prescribes that police members of all levels are personally responsible and accountable for their actions, errors or omissions, as well as for orders received by superiors and given to subordinates. Article 19 of the same Chapter prescribes that the Police inform the public on their activities in an impartial manner, pursuant to principles of confidentiality of data (with regard to protection of personal integrity of citizens, respect of the principle of presumption of innocence, and for criminal procedure purposes). Hence, professional procedures for relations with the media have been established. Chapter VIII of the Code, “Rights of Employees in the Police”, Article 34 imposes that disciplinary decisions against police members may always be disputed in a court of law, while Article 35 prescribes that Members of police subject to groundless accusations regarding their legal authorities and duties are entitled to legal assistance through the Ministry, free of charge. Chapter X of the Code “Police Responsibility and Control”, Article 60 prescribes that the Police shall be responsible before the state, citizens and their representatives, through external control of their operations, and Article 61 stipulates that state control over the police has been divided between the legislative, executive and judicial authorities. Article 62 of the Code imposes that for the purpose of developing relations between the police and the public, accountability mechanisms based on communication and mutual understanding between the police and the public need to be promoted. Police members are responsible for their actions before the citizens of the Republic of Macedonia. In the case where police members violate constitutionally guaranteed rights, citizens may invoke the protection of these rights before the Ombudsman. Article 100 of the Rulebook on Performing Duties of the Ministry of the Interior (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 12/98 and 15/03) prescribes that pursuant to a prior approved plan, organisational units of the Ministry are subject to supervision and inspection. Chapter V of the Rules on Conduct and Inter-Personal Relations prescribes special duties and authorisations that superiors are given to perform control to their subordinates. Departing from the aforementioned principles and organisational establishment of the Ministry of the Interior that operates under principles of hierarchy and subordination, higher organisational units of the Ministry may inspect the operations of the lower units. Inspections consist of examining official records or other written material regarding the enforcement of official duties and application of authorities that restrict human rights. The inspections are carried out with a direct examination of locations where security forces perform their regular duties in maintaining public order and peace on local level, as well as in other cases if necessary. By the application of the aforementioned principles, the Police Department, the Criminal Police Department and the Border Police Department through their organisational forms by way of regular and extraordinary controls and supervision, perform inspections in services of regional organisational units of the Ministry, as well as on central level among the senior civil servants. In addition, the Police Department on central level performs inspection on the operations of the Special Task Unit, the Special Rapid Deployment Unit, and Special Police Units in cases when these units have been engaged in restoring public order and peace disturbed to a larger extent, and in other cases when the scope and complexity of tasks demand their engagement. For the purpose of performing control of the legal, professional and efficient execution of operations and tasks in the Ministry, pursuant to Article 37 of the Rulebook on Execution of Operations of the Sector for Internal Control and Professional Standards of the Ministry, the Minister may order the Sector to perform supervision and control, i.e. a central or local level inspections of the senior civil servants. The inspector prepares a final report for the executed supervision and control, submitted to the Head of Sector. The Head of Sector reviews and approves the final report, after which it is submitted to the Minister. In accordance with the Rulebook, the Sector for Internal Control and Professional Standards conducts investigations and inspections, upon received information or citizens' complaints, regarding illegal and unprofessional conduct of employees in the Ministry of the Interior. The Sector may subject the Ministry's employees to medical and other examinations for the purpose of determining alcohol or/and narcotic drugs in their body after informing them about the examination reasons and with the Minister's approval. The Sector may also subject them to lining up for the purpose of identification. If in the course of investigation (inspection) on illegal and unprofessional conduct of an employee in the Ministry certain violations with criminal elements are detected, the Sector shall inform the competent public prosecutor and the Criminal Police Department. The Sector for Internal Control and Professional Standards shall inform the Minister of the Interior about every investigation (inspection) that has detected a criminal offence, violation of the working discipline or unprofessional conduct of an employee in the Ministry. In addition, if the investigation (inspection) determines grounds for initiating a dismissal procedure due to a violation of the work discipline, the Sector, pursuant to the Law on Labour Relations and the Collective Agreement of the Ministry of the Interior, shall propose a continuation of the investigation (inspection) before the Dismissal Committee. Minor cases of work discipline violation, such as violation of work duties carried out by employees with a status of authorised officials, may be subject to an initiation of a dismissal procedure, pursuant to Article 133 of the Collective Agreement of the Ministry of the Interior (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 8/98, 12/00 and 3/04) while more severe cases have been regulated in paragraph 2 of the same article. Disciplinary responsibility of employees with a status of civil servants in the Ministry has been prescribed with the Law on Civil Servants (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 59/00, 112/00, 34/01, 103/01, 43/02, 98/02, 17/03, 40/03, 85/03, and17/04). Depending on the employee's level of responsibility, the conditions under which he/she has violated the work duties, his/her conduct, and the violation’s weight and consequences, the Minister may withdraw the dismissal and impose a fine that cannot be higher than 15% of the employee's monthly salary in a period of 1 to 6 months. In cases when the Dismissal Committee, following investigations, proposes to the Minister to adopt a dismissal decision, until the decision on dismissal becomes effective the employee is removed from the post and from the Ministry if: his/her presence directly endanger the life and health of other employees and persons; he/she destroys valuable objects; his/her presence in the Ministry is detrimental to the Ministry’s operations; and if criminal procedures for a deed perpetrated at work or related to work have been initiated against the employee. In accordance with the provisions of the Law on Labour Relations (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 80/93, 14/95, 53/97, 21/98, 3/01, 50/01, 25/03 and 40/03) and the Collective Agreement of the Ministry of the Interior, the dissatisfied party (employee) may lodge a complaint to the second instance Labour Relations Commission within the Government of the Republic of Macedonia not later than 8 days from the receipt of the decision on the sanction. If the employee is not satisfied with the final decision of the competent body (the Commission), or if the Commission does not pass a decision within 15 days from the day of the complaint’s submission, pursuant to Article 147 of the Law on Labour Relations, the employee may seek protection of his/her rights before the competent court of law. From 01.01.2002 to 31.12.2002, 53 procedures for determining responsibility due to working discipline violations have been conducted against 53 employees. Out of these, upon the Dismissal Commission’s proposal, decisions on dismissal have been adopted for 9 cases; another 41 cases have been resolved with fines, and in three cases the procedure has been ceased due to lack of evidence. From 01.01.2002 to 31.12.2003, 274 procedures for determining responsibility due to working discipline violations have been conducted against 280 employees. Out of these, upon the Dismissal Commission’s proposal, decisions on dismissal have been adopted for 94 cases; another 156 cases have been resolved with fines, and in 30 cases the procedure has been ceased due to lack of evidence. At the same time, 121 criminal charges have been pressed against the employees in the Ministry of the Interior to the competent Public Prosecutor, due to reasonable doubt for committed criminal offence. From 01.01.2004 to 01.11.2004, due to determined cases of professional misconduct of employees in the Ministry of the Interior (abuse or illegal and unprofessional conduct), 245 procedures for determining professional misconduct have been filed against 260 employees. Upon the Dismissal Commission’s proposal, 35 employees have been fired, 198 have been fined and in 27 cases the procedure has been ceased due to lack of evidence. At the same time, the Sector has issued proposals for pressing criminal charges to the competent Public Prosecutor against 38 employees of the Ministry of the Interior, due to a reasonable doubt that they have committed a criminal act. On principles of hierarchy and accountability of the Ministry of the Interior see 24_G_3 and on systems of administrative and judicial control of the Ministry of Interior see 24_G_4.   12. What action has been taken in practice by the Professional Standards Unit (PSU) in dealing with police misconduct at all levels, providing for appropriate recourse and sanction? What results have been achieved (number of cases, sanctions applied etc.)? 
Sector for Internal Control and Professional Standards, in accordance with the Rulebook on Operations of the Sector for Internal Control and Professional Standards, conducts investigations, and performs supervision and control in the Ministry of the Interior. Investigation is defined as any procedure of the Sector for Internal Control and Professional Standards related to detecting and documenting illegal and unprofessional conduct of employees in the Ministry. Supervision and control are defined as any procedure of the Sector undertaken for the purpose of control of legality and the efficient execution of duties and tasks by organisational units in the Ministry. The Sector for Internal Control and Professional Standards conducts investigations on the basis of data, information and suspicion presented by the employees in the Ministry either on their own initiative or from citizen's complaints, or upon the order of the Minister, that relate to illegal and unprofessional conduct of the employees in the Ministry.   Citizen’s complaints that relate to illegal and unprofessional conduct of employees in the Ministry are lodged in a written or oral form. For every lodged complaint a report on received complaint is created, which contains the petitioner’s first and last name, date and place of birth, place of residence and address, telephone number and other information necessary to provide further contact with the petitioner. The citizen’s behaviour and appearance shall be especially described. If there is conceivable suspicion that he/she is under the influence of alcohol or narcotic drugs, such information shall also be noted. In cases when complaints are related to human rights violation by a Ministry's employee, or in cases of corruption, excessive use of force or firearms, or other serious cases of illegal and unprofessional conduct, the Sector for Internal Control and Professional Standards:   Shall review all relevant data, facts, information and reports;   Shall interrogate the petitioner and the witnesses;   Shall interrogate the employees in the Ministry that might have a certain perception with regard to the complaint;   Shall provide photographs, medical findings and evidence;   Shall interrogate the employee subject to investigation, and shall write the clarification by hand in form of official note or written clarification;   Shall take on experts from specific areas for providing expert assistance and opinion, if necessary. The Sector for Internal Control and Professional Standards keeps records, documents and determines facts utilising adequate prescribed operational and technical means and methods. If needed, and if approved by the Minister, the Sector may subject the Ministry’s employees to medical and other examinations for the purpose of detecting alcohol or narcotic drugs. Depending on the form and severity of the illegal and unprofessional conduct, the investigation time-frame may be 30 or 90 days, but not longer than six months. The Sector’s inspector prepares a final report on the investigation and its results, and submits it to the Head of Sector for review and approval, after which the final investigation report is submitted to the Minister. The investigation report, apart from giving data on the petitioner, gives reference to the allegations from the complaint; to the undertaken operational and tactical measures; to operational and technical means and methods; as well as to adopted conclusions with a proposal for measures. In the course of carrying out its competences, i.e. during the investigation process, the Sector shall act in an objective, unbiased, legal and equitable manner, by adhering to the reputation and dignity of every employee in the Ministry of the Interior, and every citizen of the Republic of Macedonia, respectively. The data, information or suspicion on the Sector’s disposal, as well as their source, are official secret and subject to the regulations on data secrecy protection. In cases where it has been determined that the employee has carried out a minor violation of the working discipline, in accordance with Article 75 of the Collective Agreement of the Ministry of the Interior (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 8/98, 12/00, and 3/04) the Sector puts forward a proposal to the employee’s direct superior to pronounce a measure  - to reduce his/her salary for the current month. In cases where the investigation determines violation of working discipline or non-compliance with the duties, in accordance with Article 143, paragraph 5 and 6 of the Collective Agreement of the Ministry of the Interior, the Sector puts forward a proposed measure to the employee’s direct superior for initiating a continuation of the investigation before the Commission for Dismissal, i.e. for initiating a procedure on determining the responsibility of professional misconduct. After deliberating, the Commission determines the worker’s responsibility and prepares a written proposal to the Minister for the purpose of adopting an adequate solution. If the Commission finds the worker not responsible or if the conditions for adopting a decision on termination of his/her employment have not been met, in accordance with Article 148, paragraph 2 of the Collective Agreement, the Commission proposes to the Minister to decline the proposal, i.e. to terminate the procedure. Should the Minister disagree with the proposal, he/she may return the subject to reconsideration, or adopt a different decision in accordance with Article 149, paragraph 1 of the Collective Agreement. The worker is entitled to lodge a complaint to the second-instance body, and/or file a suit before the competent court. If it has been determined that the worker has committed a serious violation of the working discipline, depending on the level or the worker’s responsibility; on the conditions under which the violation has been carried out; on his/her conduct; on the severity of the violation and the consequences arising from it; in accordance with Article 148 of the Collective Agreement, the Commission for Dismissal proposes to the Minister to adopt a decision for employment termination. Until the decision on the termination of employment becomes final, the employee may be removed from his/her post and from the Ministry if his/her presence endangers the workers’ or other persons’ life or health; if he/she damages properties of higher value; if his/her presence has a harmful impact on the Ministry’s operations, or in any other case when charges have been pressed against a worker for a criminal offence carried out at work or one related to work. If the Sector for Internal Control and Professional Standards, after completing the investigation, determines that there is a case with elements of criminal offence, in accordance with Article 3 of the Rulebook on Conducting Activities of the Sector for Internal Control and Professional Standards, it informs the competent public prosecutor and the Criminal Police Department. In addition, according to Article 142, paragraph 6 of the Law on Criminal Procedure (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 15/97, 44/02 and 74/04) on the basis of the gathered evidence and facts, the Sector prepares criminal charges against the worker that has committed a criminal offence and files it to the competent public prosecutor together with the evidences and writs on the already undertaken measures and activities. From 01.01.2002 to 31.12.2002, a total number of 230 complaints were lodged to the Ministry of the Interior by citizens, state bodies and institutions, citizens’ associations and other organisations. The Sector for Internal Control and Professional Standards conducted analyses, which demonstrated the following: in 65 complaints the petitioners complained on the Ministry’s failure to act upon measures under its competences; in 35 complaints the allegations referred to authorised officials’ failure to undertake measures and official activities; in 28 complaints the allegations referred to abuse of official position and authority; in 26 complaints allegations were made against unjustified or excessive use of force or coercion means by authorised officials; in 13 complaints allegations were made against improper and unprofessional conduct of Ministry’s employees; and in four cases the petitioners complained about Accident Investigation Minutes. For the purpose of verification of allegations in lodged complaints, the Sector for Internal Control and Professional Standards, apart from acting upon matters within its competence, forwarded 55 complaints to the Police Department; 44 to the Criminal Police Department; and 16 to other organisational units within the Ministry of the Interior. From verifications made by the Sector or other organisational units of the Ministry of the Interior it was determined that in 7 such cases the allegations were founded, and in 5 they were partly founded. During the same period of time, due to established cases of illegal and unprofessional conduct, 53 procedures for determining professional misconduct were filed against 53 employees in the Ministry of the Interior.  From total of 53 cases, upon the Dismissal Commission’s proposal, decisions on dismissal were delivered for 9 cases; another 41 cases were resolved with fines, and in three cases the procedure was terminated due to lack of evidence.  From 01.01.2003 to 31.12.2003, a total number of 770 complaints were lodged to the Ministry of the Interior by citizens, state bodies and institutions, citizens’ associations and other organisations, 359 of which were lodged by citizens; 120 were anonymous complaints; 63 were lodged by legal persons; 88 were official notes and other submissions by employees of the Ministry of the Interior, 23 were official information; and 39 were letters received by non-governmental and international organisations for the protection of human rights (Amnesty International, the Helsinki Committee for Human Rights, Associations of Roma, etc).  At the same time, 14 criminal charges by citizens, 20 requests by the Public Prosecutor, 20 requests by the Ombudsman and 10 complaints submitted through lawyers were filed to the Sector for Internal Control and Professional Standards.  Acting upon the lodged complaints, the Sector for Internal Control and Professional Standards in the aforementioned period conducted 526 investigations and filed the same number of reports, as well as 144 answers to the petitioners. 15 answers were submitted to the Ombudsman; four to Amnesty International, nine to legal entities, 15 to state institutions, four to the Helsinki Committee for Human Rights, and 93 were submitted to citizens.  At the same time, due to determined cases of illegal and unprofessional conduct of employees in the Ministry of the Interior, 274 procedures for determining professional misconduct were filed against 280 employees.  Upon the Dismissal Commission’s proposal, out of the total number of such procedures, decisions on dismissal were adopted for 94 cases; another 156 cases were resolved with fines, and in 30 cases the procedure was ceased due to lack of evidence.  At the same time, 121 criminal charges were pressed against the employees in the Ministry of the Interior to the competent Public Prosecutor, due to a reasonable doubt on committed criminal offence.  From 01.01.2004 to 01.09.2004, 938 complaints, submissions, etc. were filed to the Sector for Internal Control and Professional Standards, out of which 545 complaints were lodged by citizens.  At the same time, 81 written anonymous charges by citizens, 48 records of oral complaints and 20 official notes for anonymous complaints made by telephone (received on 199 telephone line installed at the 24 hours Operational Centre) were submitted to the Sector for Internal Control and Professional Standards.  In addition, 37 official notes on professional misconduct of authorised officials were submitted by Sectors and Departments for Internal Affairs; six complaints were submitted by the international organisation Amnesty International; 15 complaints were submitted by the Helsinki Committee for Human Rights; 25 requests were submitted by the National Ombudsman; eight requests by the  Basic Public Prosecutor’s Office; four requests were submitted by courts, 18 requests were submitted by lawyers; five requests by the State Commission for Prevention of Corruption; and 130 appeals, complaints and requests were submitted by legal and natural persons. Acting upon the submitted complaints, anonymous charges, requests, complaints and appeals, the Sector for Internal Control and Professional Standards carried out 433 investigations, determining that in 10 cases the complaints were founded; 77 cases lacked evidence or it was decided that the investigation should continue; and 193 complaints and anonymous charges, requests, complaints and appeals were unfounded. In the period from 01.01.2004 to 01.11.2004, due to determined cases of professional misconduct of employees in the Ministry of the Interior, 245 procedures for determining professional misconduct were filed against 260 employees. Upon the proposal of the Dismissal Commission; 35 cases were resolved by termination of employment; 198 cases were resolved by decisions for fines; and 27 cases were adjourned due to lack of evidence. At the same time, the Sector issued proposals for pressing criminal charges to the competent Public Prosecutor against 38 employees of the Ministry of the Interior, due to reasonable doubt that they have committed a criminal offence.
